Arkansas, session 2025, HB1778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-71-229(b)(1), concerning stalking in the
second degree, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) A person commits stalking in the second degree if he or she
knowingly engages in a course of conduct that harasses another person and
makes a terroristic threat with the purpose of:
(A) placing Placing that person in imminent fear of death
or serious bodily injury;
(B) or placing Placing that person in imminent fear of the
death or serious bodily injury of his or her immediate family or household
member as defined by § 5-26-302(2);
(C) Placing that person in imminent fear of unwanted
*CEB180*
04-08-2025 10:29:19 CEB180

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 HB1778
sexual intercourse, a deviate sexual activity, or other sexual contact; or
(D) Placing that person in imminent fear of unwanted
sexual intercourse, a deviate sexual activity, or other sexual contact
against his or her family or household member as defined by § 5-26-302(2).

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-71-229(f)(1), concerning the course of
conduct constituting stalking, is amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) “Course of conduct” means a pattern of conduct composed
of two (2) or more acts, separated by at least thirty-six (36) hours, but
occurring within one (1) year, including without limitation an act in which
the actor directly, indirectly, or through a third party by any action,
method, device, or means follows, monitors, observes, places under
surveillance, threatens, or communicates to or about a person or interferes
with a person's property.
(B) "Course of conduct" includes without limitation
sending mail or electronic communication to a person via electronic mail,
text messages, or any other type of electronic message sent using the
internet, websites, or social media platforms.
(C)(i) “Course of conduct” does not include
constitutionally protected activity.
(ii) If the defendant claims that he or she was
engaged in a constitutionally protected activity, the court shall determine
the validity of that claim as a matter of law and, if found valid, shall
exclude that activity from evidence;

/s/Gazaway










04-08-2025 10:29:19 CEB180